Utah statutes.
10-2-115.   Notice of number of commission or council members to be elected
and of district boundaries -- Declaration of candidacy for city office.
(1) (a)  Within 20 days of the county legislative body's receipt of the
information under Subsection 10-2-114(1)(d), the county clerk shall publish,
in accordance with Subsection (1)(b), notice containing:
(i)  the number of commission or council members to be elected for the new
city;
(ii)  if some or all of the commission or council members are to be elected by
district, a description of the boundaries of those districts as designated by
the petition sponsors under Subsection 10-2-114(1)(b);
(iii)  information about the deadline for filing a declaration of candidacy
for those seeking to become candidates for mayor or city commission or
council; and
(iv)  information about the length of the initial term of each of the city
officers, as determined by the petition sponsors under Subsection
10-2-114(1)(c).
(b)  The notice under Subsection (1)(a) shall be published:
(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the future city at least
once a week for two successive weeks; and
(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.
(c) (i) In accordance with Subsection (1)(b)(i), if there is no newspaper of
general circulation within the future city, the county clerk shall post at
least one notice per 1,000 population in conspicuous places within the future
city that are most likely to give notice to the residents of the future city.
(ii)  The notice under Subsection (1)(c)(i) shall contain the information
required under Subsection (1)(a).
(iii)  The petition sponsors shall post the notices under Subsection (1)(c)(i)
at least seven days before the deadline for filing a declaration of candidacy
under Subsection (2).
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-203(2)(a), each person seeking to become
a candidate for mayor or city commission or council of a city incorporating
under this part shall, within 45 days of the incorporation election under
Section 10-2-111, file a declaration of candidacy with the clerk of the county
in which the future city is located.
